Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB43.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3211(b.1) of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3211. Well permits.* * *(b.1) Notification.--The applicant shall submit proof of notification with the well permit application. Notification of surface owners shall be performed by sending notice to those persons to whom the tax notices for the surface property are sent, as indicated in the assessment books in the county in which the property is located. Notification of surface landowners or water purveyors shall be on forms, and in a manner prescribed by the department, sufficient to identify the rights afforded those persons under section 3218 (relating to 1234567891011121314151617 protection of water supplies) and to advise them of the advantages of taking their own predrilling or prealteration survey. The well operator shall give public notice of the filing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the locality where the permit is applied for, once a week for four consecutive weeks.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0043PN0022 - 2 - 12345678